Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 10. Jurisdiction of Courts

§ 2616.
Jurisdiction to prosecute criminal offenses.

The State’s Attorney in any county in which all or a part of any violation of this title was committed shall have authority to prosecute such violations.
The prosecution shall be conducted before the Vermont Criminal Division of the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 2617.
Jurisdiction of Superior Courts.

In all cases for which no other provision has been made, the Superior Court shall have general jurisdiction to hear and determine matters relating to elections and to fashion appropriate relief.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.